Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Administrative Provisions

§ 1211.
Recertification.

A family’s hours of employment and other countable work activities shall be verified every six months to determine continuing eligibility for the program. To the extent possible for families receiving Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, income verification may be done at the same time as the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefit recertification or verification of employment hours.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 30

, § 18, eff. Oct. 1, 2008; amended

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.013;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 1212.
Transition to other programs.

If a family loses employment meeting or exceeding the work requirements for Reach Up for the family’s size and composition and is financially eligible for Reach Up, the family shall be transferred to Reach First or Reach Up without an additional application process, unless the family chooses not to participate. Verification of income or other documentation may be required as provided for by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 30

, § 18, eff. Oct. 1, 2008; amended

2009, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 93, eff. Feb. 25, 2010.

§ 1213.
Notice and appeal.

A participant may appeal decisions in accordance with

3 V.S.A. § 3091

. The Commissioner shall provide notice to each participant of the standards and procedures applicable to such appeals. All federal and Agency of Human Services rules regarding conciliation, notice, hearing, and appeal shall be followed in connection with such appeals.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 30

, § 18, eff. Oct. 1, 2008.